Hawaii statutes.
§235‑17 Motion picture, digital
media, and film production income tax credit. [Repeal and reenactment
on January 1, 2019. L 2013, c 89, §3.] (a) Any law to the contrary
notwithstanding, there shall be allowed to each taxpayer subject to the taxes
imposed by this chapter, an income tax credit that shall be deductible from the
taxpayer's net income tax liability, if any, imposed by this chapter for the
taxable year in which the credit is properly claimed. The amount of the credit
shall be:

(1) Twenty per cent of the qualified production costs
incurred by a qualified production in any county of the State with a population
of over seven hundred thousand; or

(2) Twenty-five per cent of the qualified production
costs incurred by a qualified production in any county of the State with a
population of seven hundred thousand or less.

A qualified production occurring in more than one
county may prorate its expenditures based upon the amounts spent in each
county, if the population bases differ enough to change the percentage of tax
credit.

In the case of a partnership, S corporation,
estate, or trust, the tax credit allowable is for qualified production costs
incurred by the entity for the taxable year. The cost upon which the tax
credit is computed shall be determined at the entity level. Distribution and
share of credit shall be determined by rule.

If a deduction is taken under section 179 (with
respect to election to expense depreciable business assets) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, no tax credit shall be allowed for those
costs for which the deduction is taken.

The basis for eligible property for
depreciation of accelerated cost recovery system purposes for state income
taxes shall be reduced by the amount of credit allowable and claimed.

(b) The credit allowed under this section
shall be claimed against the net income tax liability for the taxable year.
For the purposes of this section, "net income tax liability" means
net income tax liability reduced by all other credits allowed under this
chapter.

(c) If the tax credit under this section
exceeds the taxpayer's income tax liability, the excess of credits over
liability shall be refunded to the taxpayer; provided that no refunds or
payment on account of the tax credits allowed by this section shall be made for
amounts less than $1. All claims, including any amended claims, for tax
credits under this section shall be filed on or before the end of the twelfth
month following the close of the taxable year for which the credit may be claimed.
Failure to comply with the foregoing provision shall constitute a waiver of the
right to claim the credit.

(d) To qualify for this tax credit, a
production shall:

(1) Meet the definition of a qualified production
specified in subsection (l);

(2) Have qualified production costs totaling at least
$200,000;

(3) Provide the State, at a minimum, a shared-card,
end-title screen credit, where applicable;

(4) Provide evidence of reasonable efforts to hire
local talent and crew; and

(5) Provide evidence of financial or in-kind
contributions or educational or workforce development efforts, in partnership
with related local industry labor organizations, educational institutions, or
both, toward the furtherance of the local film and television and digital media
industries.

(e) On or after July 1, 2006, no qualified
production cost that has been financed by investments for which a credit was
claimed by any taxpayer pursuant to section 235-110.9 is eligible for credits
under this section.

(f) To receive the tax credit, the taxpayer
shall first prequalify the production for the credit by registering with the
department of business, economic development, and tourism during the
development or preproduction stage. Failure to comply with this provision may
constitute a waiver of the right to claim the credit.

(g) The director of taxation shall prepare
forms as may be necessary to claim a credit under this section. The director
may also require the taxpayer to furnish information to ascertain the validity
of the claim for credit made under this section and may adopt rules necessary
to effectuate the purposes of this section pursuant to chapter 91.

(h) Every taxpayer claiming a tax credit under
this section for a qualified production shall, no later than ninety days
following the end of each taxable year in which qualified production costs were
expended, submit a written, sworn statement to the department of business,
economic development, and tourism, identifying:

(1) All qualified production costs as provided by
subsection (a), if any, incurred in the previous taxable year;

(2) The amount of tax credits claimed pursuant to
this section, if any, in the previous taxable year; and

(3) The number of total hires versus the number of
local hires by category and by county.

This information may be reported from the department
of business, economic development, and tourism to the legislature in redacted
form pursuant to subsection (i)(4).

(i) The department of business, economic
development, and tourism shall:

(1) Maintain records of the names of the taxpayers
and qualified productions thereof claiming the tax credits under subsection
(a);

(2) Obtain and total the aggregate amounts of all
qualified production costs per qualified production and per qualified production
per taxable year;

(3) Provide a letter to the director of taxation
specifying the amount of the tax credit per qualified production for each
taxable year that a tax credit is claimed and the cumulative amount of the tax
credit for all years claimed; and

(4) Submit a report to the legislature no later than
twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session detailing the
non-aggregated qualified production costs that form the basis of the tax credit
claims and expenditures, itemized by taxpayer, in a redacted format to preserve
the confidentiality of the taxpayers claiming the credit.

Upon each determination required under this
subsection, the department of business, economic development, and tourism shall
issue a letter to the taxpayer, regarding the qualified production, specifying
the qualified production costs and the tax credit amount qualified for in each
taxable year a tax credit is claimed. The taxpayer for each qualified
production shall file the letter with the taxpayer's tax return for the
qualified production to the department of taxation. Notwithstanding the
authority of the department of business, economic development, and tourism
under this section, the director of taxation may audit and adjust the tax
credit amount to conform to the information filed by the taxpayer.

(j) Total tax credits claimed per qualified
production shall not exceed $15,000,000.

(k) Qualified productions shall comply with
subsections (d), (e), (f), and (h).

(l) For the purposes of this section:

"Commercial":

(1) Means an advertising message that is filmed using
film, videotape, or digital media, for dissemination via television broadcast
or theatrical distribution;

(2) Includes a series of advertising messages if all
parts are produced at the same time over the course of six consecutive weeks;
and

(3) Does not include an advertising message with
Internet‑only distribution.

"Digital media" means production
methods and platforms directly related to the creation of cinematic imagery and
content, specifically using digital means, including but not limited to digital
cameras, digital sound equipment, and computers, to be delivered via film,
videotape, interactive game platform, or other digital distribution media.

"Post-production" means production activities
and services conducted after principal photography is completed, including but
not limited to editing, film and video transfers, duplication, transcoding,
dubbing, subtitling, credits, closed captioning, audio production, special
effects (visual and sound), graphics, and animation.

"Production" means a series of
activities that are directly related to the creation of visual and cinematic
imagery to be delivered via film, videotape, or digital media and to be sold,
distributed, or displayed as entertainment or the advertisement of products for
mass public consumption, including but not limited to scripting, casting, set
design and construction, transportation, videography, photography, sound
recording, interactive game design, and post-production.

"Qualified production":

(1) Means a production, with expenditures in the
State, for the total or partial production of a feature-length motion picture,
short film, made-for-television movie, commercial, music video, interactive
game, television series pilot, single season (up to twenty‑two episodes)
of a television series regularly filmed in the State (if the number of episodes
per single season exceeds twenty‑two, additional episodes for the same
season shall constitute a separate qualified production), television special,
single television episode that is not part of a television series regularly
filmed or based in the State, national magazine show, or national talk show.
For the purposes of subsections (d) and (j), each of the aforementioned
qualified production categories shall constitute separate, individual qualified
productions; and

(2) Does not include:

(A) News;

(B) Public affairs programs;

(C) Non-national magazine or talk shows;

(D) Televised sporting events or activities;

(E) Productions that solicit funds;

(F) Productions produced primarily for
industrial, corporate, institutional, or other private purposes; and

(G) Productions that include any material or
performance prohibited by chapter 712.

"Qualified production costs" means
the costs incurred by a qualified production within the State that are subject
to the general excise tax under chapter 237 or income tax under this chapter
and that have not been financed by any investments for which a credit was or
will be claimed pursuant to section 235‑110.9. Qualified production
costs include but are not limited to:

(1) Costs incurred during preproduction such as
location scouting and related services;

(2) Costs of set construction and operations,
purchases or rentals of wardrobe, props, accessories, food, office supplies,
transportation, equipment, and related services;

(3) Wages or salaries of cast, crew, and musicians;

(4) Costs of photography, sound synchronization,
lighting, and related services;

(5) Costs of editing, visual effects, music, other
post-production, and related services;

(6) Rentals and fees for use of local facilities and
locations, including rentals and fees for use of state and county facilities
and locations that are not subject to general excise tax under chapter 237 or
income tax under this chapter;

(7) Rentals of vehicles and lodging for cast and
crew;

(8) Airfare for flights to or from Hawaii, and
interisland flights;

(9) Insurance and bonding;

(10) Shipping of equipment and supplies to or from
Hawaii, and interisland shipments; and

(11) Other direct production costs specified by the
department in consultation with the department of business, economic
development, and tourism;

provided that any government-imposed fines,
penalties, or interest that are incurred by a qualified production within the
State shall not be "qualified production costs". [L 1997, c 107, §1;
am L 1998, c 156, §11; am L 2006, c 88, §§2, 4(2); am L 2013, c 89, §2]

Note

Annual report on tax credit to legislature. L 2013, c 89, §4.

Applicability of L 2006, c 88 amendment. L 2006, c 88,
§4(1); L 2013, c 89, §3.

The 2013 amendment applies to taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2012. L 2013, c 89, §6.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next